Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0903.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 1280h. (1) The board of a school district or board of directors of a public school academy that receives a weighted foundation payment under section 22b of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1622b, must do all of the following: (a) Address student achievement and success, including, but not limited to, literacy and mathematics. (b) Provide direct English language development instruction to English language learners. (c) Provide instruction to at-risk pupils that is consistent with the requirements under section 1280f. (d) Administer to English language learners the English language proficiency assessment known as the âWIDA ACCESS for English language learnersâ or the âWIDA Alternate ACCESSâ. (e) Agree to meet or exceed the minimum number of minutes per week, as determined by the department under subsection (2), that the school district or public school academy provides direct English language development instruction. (f) Implement a multi-tiered system of supports that is an evidence-based framework that uses data-driven problem solving to integrate academic and behavioral instruction and that uses intervention delivered to all pupils in varying intensities based on pupil needs. The multi-tiered system of supports must be implemented in grades K to 12, or, if the school district or public school academy does not operate all of grades K to 12, for all of the grades it operates. The multi-tiered system of supports described in this subdivision must provide at least all of the following essential components: (i) Team-based leadership. (ii) A tiered delivery system. (iii) Selection and implementation of instruction, interventions, and supports. (iv) A comprehensive screening and assessment system. (v) Continuous data-based decision making. (g) Support pupil needs for pupils counted toward the school districtâs or public school academyâs weighted pupil membership, including, but not limited to, items identified in a districtâs Michigan Integrated Continuous Improvement Process (MICIP) plan. An amount not to exceed 2% of the amount received from weighted foundation payments under section 22b of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1622b, may be used to support administrative costs related to complying with this section. Administrative costs include, but are not limited to, central office salaries and benefits, business and fiscal services, and school administrative staff and expenses, and do not include costs associated with direct instructional staff working with pupils counted toward the weighted pupil membership. (h) Provide information to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, necessary for the department to monitor programs and services described in this section for compliance with the requirements of this section, and to ensure the multi-tiered system of supports and English language learner programs are implemented with fidelity. (i) Allow access for the department or the departmentâs designee to audit all records related to the program for which it receives those funds. The district shall reimburse this state for all disallowances found in any audit. (j) Communicate the following information to parents and legal guardians at least annually, as applicable for grades offered by the school district or public school academy: (i) Literacy-related results for the school district or public school academy, including multiyear trend data, from the grade 3 Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP), the grade 7 Michigan student test of educational progress (M-STEP), and the SAT for pupils who are economically disadvantaged or English language learners. The school district or public school academy shall ensure that information described in this subparagraph is reported in a manner that safeguards pupil privacy. (ii) Information detailing the amount of funding received from weighted foundation payments under section 22b of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1622b, how the school district or public school academy distributed that funding, and what evidence-based interventions were implemented with that funding. The information reported under this subparagraph must include a method, including contact information, for parents or legal guardians to provide feedback on the use of the funding as well as to seek more information about services and interventions available for their children. (2) The department shall establish English language learner program models that establish a minimum number of minutes per week that school districts and public school academies must provide direct English language development instruction for pupils according to the pupilâs proficiency levels. The program models described in this subsection must be compliant with federal requirements related to English language learner program services. (3) The department shall monitor school districts and public school academies for compliance with this section and may require school districts and public school academies to provide any information to the department, in a form and manner determined by the department, necessary to fulfill this requirement. (4) As used in this section: (a) âAt-risk pupilâ means a pupil in grades pre-K to 12 for whom the district has documentation that the pupil meets any of the following criteria: (i) The pupil is economically disadvantaged. (ii) The pupil is an English language learner. (iii) The pupil is chronically absent as defined by and reported to the center for educational performance and information created under section 94a of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1694a. (iv) The pupil is a victim of child abuse or neglect. (v) The pupil is a pregnant teenager or teenage parent. (vi) The pupil has a family history of school failure, incarceration, or substance abuse. (vii) The pupil is an immigrant who has immigrated within the immediately preceding 3 years. (viii) The pupil did not complete high school in 4 years and is still continuing in school as identified in the Michigan cohort graduation and dropout report. (ix) For pupils for whom the results of the state summative assessment have been received, is a pupil who did not achieve proficiency on the English language arts, mathematics, science, or social studies content area assessment. (x) Is a pupil who is at risk of not meeting the school districtâs or public school academyâs core academic curricular objectives in English language arts or mathematics, as demonstrated on local assessments. (b) âEnglish language learnerâ and âweighted pupil membershipâ mean those terms as defined in section 6 of the state school aid act of 1979, MCL 388.1606. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Secretary of the Senate Clerk of the House of Representatives Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor